Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3721
Violations; penalty.

If any person shall willfully violate the provisions of sections 44-3701 to 44-3720, such person shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 21.